Washington statutes.
RCW 43.365.030

Board of directors—Standards for evaluating funding applications—Awards of financial assistance—Deposit of contributions—Rules—Duties of directors.

(1) A Washington motion picture competitiveness program under this chapter must be administered by a board of directors appointed by the governor, and the appointments must be made within sixty days following enactment. The department, after consulting with the board, must adopt rules for the standards that shall be used to evaluate the applications for funding assistance prior to June 30, 2006.

(2) The board must evaluate and award financial assistance to motion picture projects under rules set forth under RCW 43.365.020.

(3) The board must consist of the following members:

(a) Two members representing the Washington motion picture production industry, one of whom must demonstrate expertise in the financing of motion picture projects;

(b) One member representing technologies impacting the Washington emerging motion picture industry;

(c) Two members representing labor unions affiliated with Washington motion picture production;

(d) Three members representing industries and businesses impacted by motion picture production, one of whom must represent industries or businesses located east of the crest of the Cascade mountain range and one of whom must represent industries or businesses located west of the crest of the Cascade mountain range;

(e) Two cochairs of the board's equity committee, not already serving on the board, recommended by the board to the governor;

(f) Two cochairs of the board's advisory committee, also known as the film leadership council, not already serving on the board, recommended by the board to the governor; and

(g) A chairperson, chosen at large, must serve at the pleasure of the governor.

(4) The term of the board members, other than the chair, is four years, except as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

(5) The governor must appoint board members to four-year staggered terms, except the board member initially appointed to the position in subsection (3)(b) of this section and the board member initially appointed to the position in subsection (3)(f) of this section must each be appointed to a two-year term. Once those initial two-year terms expire, all subsequent terms are for four years.

(6) A board member appointed by the governor may be removed by the governor for cause under RCW 43.06.070 and 43.06.080.

(7) Seven members of the board constitute a quorum.

(8) The board must elect a treasurer and secretary annually, and other officers as the board members determine necessary, and may adopt bylaws or rules for its own government.

(9) The board must make any information available at the request of the department to administer this chapter.

(10) Contributions received by a board must be deposited into the account described in RCW 43.365.020(2).

(11) Board members must comply with all requirements of a 501(c)(6) organization, including the prohibition on using information obtained as a board member for personal gain. Board members must act in the best interest of the approved motion picture competitiveness program. Each board member is required to complete an annual conflicts of interest form to disclose all conflicts and potential conflicts of interest with board actions. If a board member has a conflict of interest with respect to an application for funding assistance, the board member must disclose the board member's conflict and not be present for a discussion or vote on the application.

[ 2022 c 270 s 3; 2012 c 189 s 3; 2008 c 85 s 2; 2006 c 247 s 4.]